Nebraska, session 109, LB779.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB779 LB779
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) No health care facility, as defined in section
71-413, or collection agency, as defined in section 45-602, shall charge
a patient interest or late fees on medical debt until ninety days after
the due date of the final invoice and no such interest or fees shall
exceed three percent of the amount of the medical debt per year. For
purposes of this section, medical debt means an obligation to pay money
arising from the receipt of health care services.
(2) An individual's primary residential property shall not be the
subject of liens or foreclosures for the purpose of collecting medical
debt.
-2-